District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.10

Naming of sponsored recreation facilities.

(a)

Notwithstanding § 9-204.01, the Mayor may name in honor of a person a Department of Parks and Recreation athletic field that is adopted or sponsored pursuant to § 10-304; provided, that:

(1)

The naming is detailed in an agreement between the Mayor and the entity adopting or sponsoring the field;

(2)

The agreement requires the financial adoption or sponsorship of the field;

(3)

The name is that of a current or former professional sports player who may be living or deceased less than 2 years; and

(4)

The naming is not permanent.

(b)

The District may display the logo of an entity sponsoring or adopting a field on signage at the field; provided, that the display of the logo be less prominent than the name of the person for whom the field is named, and that the display be consistent with the terms of the agreement required by subsection (a)(1) of this section.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 410
as added Feb. 26, 2016, D.C. Law 21-68, § 2(b), 62 DCR 16266
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section see §  2(b) of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-302, Feb. 18, 2016, 63 DCR 2171).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see §  2(b) of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-201, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15274).